Wisconsin, session 2025, SB477.
do enact as follows:SB477,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB477,26Section 2. 20.435 (5) (dr) of the statutes is created to read:SB477,2,8720.435 (5) (dr) Statewide suicide prevention program. The amounts in the 8schedule for implementing the suicide prevention program under s. 51.03 (7).SB477,39Section 3. 51.03 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB477,2,141051.03 (7) (a) The department shall implement a suicide prevention program 11that creates public awareness for issues relating to suicide prevention, builds 12community networks, and conducts training programs on suicide prevention for law 13enforcement personnel, health care providers, school employees, and other persons 14who have contact with persons at risk of suicide.SB477,2,1615(b) As part of the suicide prevention program under this subsection, the 16department shall do all of the following:SB477,2,17171. Coordinate suicide prevention activities with other state agencies.SB477,2,19182. Provide educational activities to the general public relating to suicide 19prevention.SB477,2,22203. Provide training to persons who routinely interact with persons at risk of 21suicide, including training on recognizing persons at risk of suicide and referring 22those persons for appropriate treatment or support services.SB477,2,24234. Develop and carry out public awareness and media campaigns in each 24county targeting groups of persons who are at risk of suicide.SB477,3,115. Enhance crisis services relating to suicide prevention.SB477,3,426. Link persons trained in the assessment of and intervention in suicide with 3schools, public community centers, nursing homes, and other facilities serving 4persons most at risk of suicide.SB477,3,657. Coordinate the establishment of local advisory groups in each county to 6support the efforts of the suicide prevention program under this subsection.SB477,3,1278. Work with groups advocating suicide prevention, community coalitions, 8managers of existing crisis hotlines that are nationally accredited or certified, and 9staff members of mental health agencies in this state to identify and address the 10barriers that interfere with providing services to groups of persons who are at risk 11of suicide, including elderly persons, Native Americans, youths, and residents of 12rural communities.SB477,3,16139. Develop and maintain a website with links to appropriate resource 14documents, suicide hotlines that are nationally accredited or certified, credentialed 15professional personnel, state and local mental health agencies, and appropriate 16national organizations.SB477,3,191710. Review current research on data collection for factors related to suicide 18and develop recommendations for improved systems of surveillance for suicide and 19uniform collection of data related to suicide.SB477,3,212011. Develop and submit proposals for funding from federal government 21agencies and nongovernmental organizations.SB477,3,222212. Administer grant programs involving suicide prevention.SB477,4,22313. By January 1, 2027, and by January 1 of each year thereafter, submit to 24the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) a report 1that describes suicide prevention activities in this state, including information 2received in the course of administering suicide prevention grant programs.SB477,43Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.SB477,4,94(1) Suicide prevention program; director and staff. The authorized FTE 5positions for the department of health services are increased by 2.0 GPR positions 6on the effective date of this subsection, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 720.435 (5) (dr), for the purpose of providing a director of the suicide prevention 8program under s. 51.03 (7) and staff to implement the suicide prevention program 9under 51.03 (7).SB477,4,1010